Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1088
Rules and regulations, defined.

Rules and regulations shall mean rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department pursuant to the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 17.